Utah statutes.
11-49-601.   Review of ethics complaint for compliance with form requirements -- Independent requirements for complaint -- Notice.

(1)  Within five business days after receipt of a complaint, the staff of the commission, in consultation with the chair of the commission, shall examine the complaint to determine if it is in compliance with Sections 11-49-301 and 11-49-501.

(2) (a)  If the chair determines that the complaint does not comply with Sections 11-49-301 and 11-49-501, the chair shall:

(i)  return the complaint to the first complainant named on the complaint with:

(A)  a statement detailing the reason for the non-compliance; and

(B)  a copy of the applicable provisions in this chapter; and

(ii)  notify the applicable political subdivision governing body that:

(A)  a complaint was filed against an unidentified political subdivision officer or employee but was returned for non-compliance with this chapter; and

(B)  the fact that a complaint was filed and returned shall be kept confidential until the commission submits its annual summary data report as required by Section 11-49-202.

(b)  If a complaint is returned for non-compliance with the requirements of this chapter, a complainant may file another complaint if the new complaint independently meets the requirements of Sections 11-49-301 and 11-49-501, including any requirements for timely filing.

(3)  If the chair determines that the complaint complies with the requirements of this section, the chair shall:

(a)  accept the complaint;

(b)  notify each member of the commission that the complaint has been filed and accepted;

(c)  notify the applicable political subdivision that:

(i)  a complaint has been filed against an unidentified political subdivision officer or employee;

(ii)  the identity of the political subdivision officer or employee and the allegations raised in the complaint are confidential pending the commission's preliminary review of the complaint; and

(iii)  the fact that a complaint was filed shall be kept confidential until the commission publicly discloses the existence of the complaint via:

(A)  notice of the commission's review of a complaint in accordance with Section 11-49-701; or

(B)  submission of the commission's annual summary data report as required in Section 11-49-202; and

(d)  promptly forward the complaint to the political subdivision officer or employee who is the subject of the ethics complaint via personal delivery or a delivery method that provides verification of receipt, together with a copy of this chapter and notice of the officer's or employee's deadline for filing a response to the complaint if the complaint is not dismissed under Section 11-49-602.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

